Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1251.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 9(a) of the act of October 10, 1975 (P.L.383, No.110), known as the Physical Therapy Practice Act, is amended to read:SECTION 1. THE DEFINITION OF "PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT" IN SECTION 2 OF THE ACT OF OCTOBER 10, 1975 (P.L.383, NO.110), KNOWN AS THE PHYSICAL THERAPY PRACTICE ACT, IS AMENDED AND THE SECTION IS AMENDED BY ADDING A DEFINITION TO READ:SECTION 2. DEFINITIONS.--THE FOLLOWING DEFINITIONS SHALL APPLY, WHEN USED IN THIS ACT, UNLESS OTHERWISE EXPRESSED THEREIN:* * *<--<--<--1234567891011121314151617 "MIDWIFE" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL LICENSED UNDER THE ACT OF DECEMBER 20, 1985 (P.L.457, NO.112), KNOWN AS THE "MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT OF 1985."* * *"PHYSICIAN ASSISTANT" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL AS DEFINED IN THE ACT OF OCTOBER 5, 1978 (P.L.1109, NO.261), KNOWN AS THE "OSTEOPATHIC MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT," OR THE [ACT OF DECEMBER 20, 1985 (P.L.457, NO.112), KNOWN AS THE] "MEDICAL PRACTICE ACT OF 1985."* * *SECTION 2. SECTION 9(A) OF THE ACT IS AMENDED TO READ:Section 9. Practice of Physical Therapy.--(a) Except as provided in subsection (b), no individual licensed under this act as a physical therapist shall treat human ailments by physical therapy or otherwise except by the referral of an individual licensed as a physician, a licensed physician assistant practicing pursuant to a written agreement with a physician or a certified registered nurse practitioner practicing pursuant to a collaborative agreement with a physician; however, a physical therapist shall be permitted to accept the referral of a licensed dentist [or], podiatrist[,] or certified nurse midwife for the treatment of a condition that is within the scope of practice of dentistry [or], podiatry or midwifery. Nothing in this act shall be construed as authorization for a physical therapist to practice any branch of the healing arts except as described in this act. For purposes of this section, relating to referrals, a licensed physician, dentist [or], podiatrist or certified nurse midwife means an individual holding an active license in this Commonwealth, the District of Columbia or any other state or United States 20250HB1251PN2533 - 2 - <--<--123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 territory.* * *Section 2 3. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1251PN2533 - 3 - <--123